Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 3 Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest

53-12-400.
When the right to income begins and ends.

An income beneficiary shall be entitled to net income from the date on which the income interest begins. An income interest shall begin on the date specified in the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an asset becomes subject to a trust or successive income interest.

An asset shall become subject to a trust:

On the date it is transferred to the trust in the case of an asset that is transferred to a trust during the transferor’s life;

On the date of a testator’s death in the case of an asset that becomes subject to a trust by reason of a will, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the testator’s estate; or

On the date of an individual’s death in the case of an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of such individual’s death.

An asset shall become subject to a successive income interest on the day after the preceding income interest ends, as determined under subsection (d) of this Code section, even if there is an intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.

An income interest shall end on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another terminating event occurs, or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may distribute income.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-400

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-401.
Apportionment of receipts and disbursements when decedent dies or income interest begins.

A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to principal if its due date occurs before a decedent dies in the case of an estate or before an income interest begins in the case of a trust or successive income interest.

A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to income if its due date occurs on or after the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins and it is a periodic due date. An income receipt or disbursement shall be treated as accruing from day to day if its due date is not periodic or it has no due date. The portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the date on which a decedent dies or an income interest begins shall be allocated to principal, and the balance shall be allocated to income.

An item of income or an obligation shall be due on the date the payor is required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there shall be no due date for the purposes of this Code section. Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which Code Section 53-12-410 applies shall be deemed to be due on the date fixed by the entity for determining who is entitled to receive the distribution or, if no date is fixed, on the declaration date for the distribution. A due date shall be periodic for receipts or disbursements that have to be paid at regular intervals under a lease or an obligation to pay interest or if an entity customarily makes distributions at regular intervals.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-401

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-402.
Apportionment when income interest ends.

As used in this Code section, the term “undistributed income” means net income received before the date on which an income interest ends. Such term shall not include an item of income or expense that is due or accrued or net income that has been added or is required to be added to principal under the terms of the trust.

When a mandatory income interest ends, the trustee shall pay to a mandatory income beneficiary who survives that date, or the estate of a deceased mandatory income beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end, the beneficiary’s share of the undistributed income that is not disposed of under the terms of the trust unless the beneficiary has an unqualified power to revoke more than 5 percent of the trust immediately before the income interest ends. In the latter case, the undistributed income from the portion of the trust that may be revoked shall be added to principal.

When a trustee’s obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust’s assets ends, the trustee shall prorate the final payment if and to the extent required by applicable law to accomplish a purpose of the trust or its settlor relating to income, gift, estate, or other tax requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-402

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.